Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-358.05
Child or spousal support; performance of decree; court powers.

After a hearing on the issue, the court may order immediate implementation of income withholding pursuant to the Income Withholding for Child Support Act or require the posting of a bond at the time that a temporary or permanent child support or spousal support decree is issued to insure performance of the decree.

Laws 1975, LB 212, § 7;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 7, § 12.

Income Withholding for Child Support Act, see section 43-1701.